Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.30.646

Alternative jet fuels work group. (Expires January 1, 2029.)

(1) Washington State University must convene an alternative jet fuels work group to further the development of alternative jet fuel as a productive industry in Washington. The work group must include members from the legislature and sectors involved in alternative jet fuel research, development, production, and utilization. The work group must provide a report including any pertinent recommendations to the governor and appropriate committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024, and December 1st of every even-numbered year until December 1, 2028.

(2) This section expires January 1, 2029.

[ 2023 c 232 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 232 ss 1-7: See note following RCW 70A.535.010.

Automatic expiration date exemption—2023 c 232: See note following RCW 82.04.287.

Intent—2023 c 232: See note following RCW 70A.535.010.